Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1747YH (3) 91 je/js H.F. 611 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91D.2 Wage rate for holidays. 1 An employer who requires an employee to work on any of the 2 following days shall pay the employee for such work performed 3 on such day at a rate of one and one-half times the regular rate 4 at which the employee is employed: 5 1. A legal public holiday as described in section 1C.1. 6 2. A paid holiday as described in section 1C.2, subsection 7 1. 8 3. A federal holiday observed by the United States postal 9 service. 10 4. A banking holiday observed by the federal reserve. 11